src/pron-myv-morph.txt
! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !
LEXICON Interr-Pers
+Interr+Prs: # ; ! кие THIS should be depricated

LEXICON PERS

< м о н:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+1Sg":0 "@P.PossPx.1Sg@" "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@P.TPERS.1@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
< т о н:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+2Sg":0 "@P.PossPx.2Sg@" "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@P.TPERS.2@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
< с о н:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+3Sg":0 "@P.PossPx.3Sg@" "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@P.TPERS.3@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
< м и н:0 ь:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+1Pl":0 "@P.PossPx.1Pl@" "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@P.TPERS.1@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
< т ы н:0 ь:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+2Pl":0 "@P.PossPx.2Pl@" "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@P.TPERS.2@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
< с ы н:0 ь:0 "+Pron":0 "+Pers":0 "+3Pl":0 "@P.PossPx.3Pl@" "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@P.TPERS.3@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!!!!!!
эсь+Refl+Pron:эсь PersPron_Minsy ;
эсь+Refl+Adn:эсь # ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+2Sg+Noun2+Pl+Det+Nom:эсетне Clitic ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+2Sg+OldOrth+Pl+Det:эсетне kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

эсь+Refl+Pron+3Pl+Noun2+Pl+Det+Nom:эсестнэ Clitic ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+3Pl+OldOrth+Pl+Det:эсестнэ kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
!Dealing with short comings! need to be fixed
эсь+Refl+Pron+2Sg+Noun2+Transl:эсетекс Clitic ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+2Sg+Noun2+Nom+Det+Sg:эсетесь Clitic ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+2Sg+Noun2+Gen+Det+Sg:эсетенть Clitic ;
эсь+Refl+Pron+Dat+Poss+1Pl+:эстенек Clitic ;
мон+Dial+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Abl+NoPoss:монде Clitic ;
тон+Dial+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Abl+NoPoss:тонде Clitic ;

мон+Dial+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:монстеме Clitic ;
тон+Dial+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:тонстеме Clitic ;

мон+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Pron+Dem:монете kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
тон+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Pron+Dem:тонете kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;




LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1
< 0:н "+Nom":0 "@D.TNUM.PL@" > kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+Nom":0 "@D.TNUM.SG@" > kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:н 0:с 0:ь "+Intensive":0 > PersPron_Minsy ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@N.TPERS.1@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:ь "+NoPoss":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@N.TPERS.2@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@""@N.TPERS.2@" "@C.TNUM@" > Tenses1 ;

< 0:н 0:з 0:э "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@N.TPERS.3@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@""@N.TPERS.1@" "@C.TNUM@" > lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@""@N.TPERS.2@"  "@C.TNUM@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@""@N.TPERS.3@"  "@C.TNUM@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!PROBLEM 2009-09-16 why does nstY4 have the Y4

!+Refl+Gen+Pron:%>О1нсе PersPron_Gen ;
+Dial+Refl+LV+Gen+Pron:%>О1нси PersPron_Gen ;


!2! Pers_Pronouns1_es ;
!2!+Indet+Gen+Det:нсе CXPossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abe:%>О1нстеме PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abl:%>О1нстеде PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Comp:%>О1нсешка PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Dat:%>О1нсте PossPX1 ;

< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь "+Gen":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.2@"> kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:о "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "+Gen":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.3@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;

+Abl:%>О1нде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Abl:%>О1ндеде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Gen+Abl:%>О1нденде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Dat:не  PersPron_PossPX ;
+Ill:ньзэ  PersPron_PossPX ;
< 0:н 0:ь 0:к 0:с "+Tra":0 "@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ; 
< 0:н 0:ь 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:к 0:с "+Tra":0 "+LV":0 "+Tra":0"@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ; 

+Abl:%>О1нде PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Abe:%>О1нтеме PersPron_Oblique ;
+Comp:%>О1ньшка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ela:%>О1ньстэ PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ine:%>О1ньсэ PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Prl:%>О1ньга PersPron_Oblique ;

!!!!
!
LEXICON PersPron_Minsy
+Nom: osh-Tenses1 ;
!!!< "@N.TPERS.1@" "@N.TPERS.2@" "@N.TPERS.3@" "@C.TNUM@"> PersPron_Gen ;
+Dat:%>те PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl+Abl:%>теде PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl:%>О1де PersPron_PossPX ;
+Prl:%>Г2а PersPron_Oblique ;
+LV+Comp:%>О1шка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 PersPron_Oblique ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:к 0:с  "+LV":0 "+Transl":0 "@P.LV.ON@" > osh-PersPron_PossPX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:ь "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;

LEXICON PersPron_Gen
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:ь "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 "+LV":0 "+Gen":0 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;

LEXICON PersPron_Oblique
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:м "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> kal-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TNUM@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> lak-PersPronGen_CX ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> kit-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;


!!Copied from "PossPX1"
!!These PossPXs are applied after Obl cases
!!
LEXICON PersPron_PossPX 
< 0:">" 0:н 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-PersPron_PossPX 
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+Poss":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+Poss":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:к "+Poss":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:т  "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:т  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Poss":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" "@D.LV.ON@"> Clitic ;
+Dial+NoPoss: Clitic ;




!!!This is preceded by a pronoun in the "+Gen"
LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kal-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N: kal-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> lak-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N:  lak-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kit-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N:  kit-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX
< "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
+Der/MWN+N: kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Use/Sub/OldOrth":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:с 0:е "+SOD":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;
< "+Der/MWN":0 "+N":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Gen":0 "+Det":0 "+Pron":0 "@C.DNUM@" "@C.TPERS@" "@C.TNUM@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A ;



LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kal-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          lak-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kit-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
